Utah statutes.
17-27a-206.   Third party notice.

(1)  If a county requires notice to adjacent property owners, the county shall:

(a)  mail notice to the record owner of each parcel within parameters specified by county ordinance; or

(b)  post notice on the property with a sign of sufficient size, durability, print quality, and location that is reasonably calculated to give notice to passers-by.

(2)  If a county mails notice to third party property owners under Subsection (1), it shall mail equivalent notice to property owners within an adjacent jurisdiction.

